California statutes. Education Code
(b) For sponsors of those who receive reimbursement for meals only from the state, the State Department of Education shall make allowances for the Child Nutrition Program on an annual basis. Program providers shall submit claims to the department within 10 calendar days of the end of each state fiscal year. Claims submitted after August 20 of the fiscal year immediately following the year for which reimbursement is claimed shall be invalid. Within 45 calendar days of the claim deadline, the State Department of Education shall tender reimbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1546, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

41353.

From funds appropriated for child nutrition the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make the following expenditures:

(a) Not to exceed 20 percent, for state administrative expenses.

(b) Not to exceed 80 percent, for distribution to child nutrition entities, as defined by Section 49530.5, which maintain nutrition education programs on a project approval basis pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 49534 and for expenditure by the Department of Education; provided, however, that of such 80 percent not more than 5 percent thereof shall be used by the department for the development, implementation, supervision, and evaluation of nutrition education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1546, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Loans and Advances [41360. - 41367.]

41360.

(a) Loans may be made from moneys in the Public School District Organization Revolving Fund to newly organized elementary, high school, or unified school districts upon application of the governing board of any such school district, certified by the county superintendent of schools and approved by the Superintendent for use by the school district during the period from the date the action to form the school district was completed and the date the school district becomes effective for all purposes. Money loaned to a school district pursuant to this section shall be used only to meet one or more of the following:

(1) The expenses of office rental, office supplies, postage, telephone, and telegraphing.

(2) The expenses of necessary elections required by law or authorized by Section 35532.

(3) The expenses of employing, the salary of, and necessary travel expenses of officers and necessary clerical help for the governing board of the school district.

(b) During each of the two successive fiscal years commencing with the first fiscal year of the existence of the school district for all purposes, the Controller shall deduct from apportionments made to that school district an amount equal to one-half of the amount loaned to that school district under this section and pay the same amount into the Public School District Organization Revolving Fund in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 58.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

41365.

(a) The Charter School Revolving Loan Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. The Charter School Revolving Loan Fund shall be composed of federal funds obtained by the state for charter schools and any other funds appropriated or transferred to the fund through the annual budget process. Funds appropriated to the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund shall remain available for purposes of the fund until reappropriated or reverted by the Legislature through the annual Budget Act or any other act.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the administration of the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund shall be transferred to the California School Finance Authority.

(c) Upon application and approval by the California School Finance Authority, loans may be made from moneys in the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund to a chartering authority for one or more charter schools, none of which are a conversion of an existing school, or directly to a charter school that qualifies to receive funding pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 47630) of Part 26.8 of Division 4 that is not a conversion of an existing school. Money loaned to a chartering authority for a charter school, or directly to a charter school, pursuant to this section shall be used
 only to meet the purposes of the charter granted pursuant to Section 47605. The loan to a chartering authority for a charter school, or directly to a charter school, pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) over the lifetime of the charter school receiving the benefit of the loan. A charter school may receive money obtained from multiple loans made directly to the charter school or to the charter school’s chartering authority from the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund, as long as the total amount received from the fund over the lifetime of the charter school does not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(d) The California School Finance Authority may consider all of the following when making a determination to approve a charter school’s loan application:

(1) The soundness of the financial business plans of the applicant charter school.

(2) Availability of the charter school of other sources of funding.

(3) Geographic distribution of loans made from the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund.

(4) The impact that receipt of funds received pursuant to this section will have on the charter school’s receipt of other private and public financing.

(5) Plans for creative uses of the funds received pursuant to this section, such as loan guarantees or other types of credit enhancements.

(6) The
 financial needs of the charter school.

(e) Priority for loans from the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund shall be given in the following order:

(1) To new charter schools for startup costs.

(2) Until July 1, 2029, to charter schools that were damaged, destroyed, or closed for 10 or more schooldays as a result of conditions of disaster or of extreme peril in response to which the Governor has proclaimed a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) Commencing with the first fiscal year following the fiscal year
 the charter school receives the loan, the Controller shall deduct from apportionments made to the chartering authority or charter school, as appropriate, an amount equal to the annual repayment of the amount loaned to the chartering authority or charter school for the charter school under this section and pay the same amount into the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund in the State Treasury. Repayment of the full amount loaned to the chartering authority or charter school shall be deducted by the Controller in equal annual amounts over a number of years agreed upon between the loan recipient and the state agency authorized to administer the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund and the Charter School Security Fund.

(2) Charter schools that meet the priority criteria of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) may request to start payments no later than the
 first fiscal year after the most recent full year of operation, subject to the approval of the California School Finance Authority.

(3) (A) The number of repayment years pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed five years.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the number of repayment years pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not exceed eight years for charter schools that meet the priority criteria of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a loan may be made directly to a charter school pursuant to this section only in the case of a charter school that is established and operating pursuant to Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600) of Division 4.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of default of a loan made directly to a charter school pursuant to this section, the charter school and the entity managing the charter school, as defined in Section 47604.1, shall be liable for repayment of the loan.

(h) The California School Finance Authority may adopt any necessary rules and regulations for the implementation of this section and Sections 41366.6 and 41367. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (SB 631)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41366.5.

(a) Moneys in the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund shall be loaned at (1) the rate paid on moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account as of the date of disbursement of the funds or (2) a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, computed according to the true interest cost method, whichever is less, except that the rate shall not be set at a rate lower than 3 percent.

(b) A charter school shall pay the interest on any loan from the fund in regular installments withdrawn from the annual apportionment the charter school receives.

(c) All interest payments shall be paid into the Charter School Security Fund established pursuant to Section 41367.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 776, Sec. 2.   (SB 631)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41366.6.

(a) The California School Finance Authority shall monitor the adequacy of the amount of funds in the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund and report annually to the Department of Finance and the Controller on the need, if any, to transfer funds from the Charter School Security Fund to the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund for the sole purpose of replacing funds lost in the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund due to loan defaults. Before requesting any transfer of funds from the Charter School Security Fund, the California School Finance Authority shall make all reasonable efforts to recover funds directly from the defaulting loan recipient. To the extent that the California School Finance Authority determines that a transfer from the Charter
 School Security Fund to the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund is necessary, the California School Finance Authority shall obtain approval from the Director of Finance before a transfer of funds is made. Not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Director of Finance shall direct the Controller to transfer the appropriate amount of funds.

(b) (1) By October 1 of each year, and in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the California School Finance Authority shall provide detailed fund condition information for the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund and the Charter School Security Fund to the Department of Finance, the Assembly Committee on Education, the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Budget Subcommittee on
 Education Finance, the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee on Education, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office. At a minimum, this information shall contain an accounting of actual beginning balances, revenues, itemized expenditures, and ending balances for the prior year, as well as projected beginning balances, revenues, itemized expenditures, and ending balances for the current year and budget year.

(2) (A) For the report due by October 1, 2029, the California School Finance Authority shall, in addition to the information required pursuant to paragraph (1), include an analysis and summary of the expenditures of loan funds made by the charter school loan recipient for loans issued on or after July 1, 2026. The analysis and summary shall include, but not be limited to, expenditure information related to
 facilities, employees, startup costs, equipment, direct services to pupils, and the administration of the loan, as applicable.

(B) The California School Finance Authority shall first use information provided by the charter school loan recipient in the charter school’s loan application and in program audits before requesting additional information from the charter school loan recipient.

(C) Charter school loan recipients shall provide information requested by the California School Finance Authority in order to meet the requirements of this paragraph.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 776, Sec. 3.   (SB 631)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

41366.7.

The Director of Finance shall monitor the adequacy of the amount of funds in the Charter School Security Fund and report annually to the Legislature on the need, if any, to adjust the interest rate set forth in Section 41366.5 or to revise any other aspect of the default recovery plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 586, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41367.

(a) The Charter School Security Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Moneys in the fund shall be available for deposit into the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund in case of default on any loan made from the Charter School Revolving Loan Fund.

(c) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, the administration of the Charter School Security Fund shall be transferred to the California School Finance Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 16.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Conditions for Use of Apportionments [41370. - 41382.]

41370.

(a) The governing board of a school district, the governing body of a charter school, and a county board of education shall, except as may otherwise be specifically provided by law, use all money apportioned to the school district, charter school, or county office of education from the State School Fund during any fiscal year exclusively for the support of the school or schools of the school district, charter school, or county office of education for that year.

(b) School districts, charter schools, and county offices of education shall not expend funds provided in satisfaction of the state’s minimum funding obligation to school districts and community
 college districts pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution for courses or instruction offered by private or public colleges or universities beyond that permitted in pursuit of a high school diploma, except for courses or instruction in which pupils are enrolled in before July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 23.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

41371.

If at the end of any fiscal year during which the schools of a school district have been maintained for the period required or permitted by law, there is standing to the credit of the district an unexpended balance of money received from the State School Fund, it may be expended for the payment of claims against the district outstanding, or it may be expended during the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41372.

For purposes of this section:

(a) “Salaries of classroom teachers” and “teacher” shall have the same meanings as prescribed by Section 41011 provided, however, that the cost of all health and welfare benefits provided to the teachers by the school district shall be included within the meaning of salaries of classroom teachers.

(b) “Current expense of education” means the gross total expended (not reduced by estimated income or estimated federal and state apportionments) for the purposes classified in the final budget of a school district (except one which, during the preceding fiscal year, had less than 101 units of average daily attendance) submitted to and approved by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to Section 42127 for certificated salaries other than certificated salaries for pupil transportation, food services, and community services; classified salaries other than classified salaries for pupil transportation, food services, and community services; employee benefits other than employee benefits for pupil transportation personnel, food services personnel, and community services personnel; books, supplies, and equipment replacement other than for pupil transportation and food services; and community services, contracted services, and other operating expenses other than for pupil transportation, food services, and community services. “Current expense of education,” for purposes of this section shall not include those expenditures classified as sites, buildings, books, and media and new equipment (object of expenditure 6000 of the California School Accounting Manual), the amount expended from categorical aid received from the federal or state government which funds were granted for expenditures in a program not incurring any teacher salary expenditures or requiring disbursement of the funds without regard to the requirements of this section, or expenditures for facility acquisition and construction; and shall not include the amount expended pursuant to any lease agreement for plant and equipment or the amount expended from funds received from the federal government pursuant to the “Economic Opportunity Act of 1964” or any extension of this act of Congress.

There shall be expended during each fiscal year for payment of salaries of classroom teachers:

(1) By an elementary school district, 60 percent of the district’s current expense of education.

(2) By a high school district, 50 percent of the district’s current expense of education.

(3) By a unified school district, 55 percent of the district’s current expense of education.

If the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district determines, on the basis of an audit conducted pursuant to Section 41020, that a school district has not expended the applicable percentage of current expense of education for the payment of salaries of classroom teachers during the preceding fiscal year, the county superintendent of schools shall, in apportionments made to the school district from the State School Fund after April 15 of the current fiscal year, designate an amount of this apportionment or apportionments equal to the apparent deficiency in district expenditures. Any amount designated by the county superintendent of schools shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of the school district, but shall be unavailable for expenditure by the district pending the determination to be made by the county superintendent of schools on any application for exemption which may be submitted to the county superintendent of schools. If it appears to the governing board of a school district that the application of the preceding paragraphs of this section during a fiscal year results in serious hardship to the district, or in the payment of salaries of classroom teachers in excess of the salaries of classroom teachers paid by other districts of comparable type and functioning under comparable conditions, the board may apply to the county superintendent of schools in writing not later than September 15th of the succeeding fiscal year for exemption from the requirements of the preceding paragraphs of this section for the fiscal year on account of which the application is made. Upon receipt of this application, the county superintendent of schools shall grant the district exemption for any amount that is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). If the amount is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or greater, the county superintendent of schools may grant an exemption from the requirements for the fiscal year on account of which the application is made. If the exemption is granted by the county superintendent of schools, the designated moneys shall be immediately available for expenditure by the school district governing board. If no application for exemption is made or exemption is denied, the county superintendent of schools shall order the designated amount or amount not exempted to be added to the amounts to be expended for salaries of classroom teachers during the next fiscal year.

The county superintendent of schools shall enforce the requirements prescribed by this section, and may adopt necessary rules and regulations to that end.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 18.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

41374.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Section 41372 shall not apply to any elementary school district, high school district, or unified school district, which maintains no individual class session with pupils in attendance exceeding the numbers, for the particular grade levels, following:

(a) An elementary school district—twenty-eight (28) pupils.

(b) A high school district—twenty-five (25) pupils.

(c) A unified school district—twenty-eight (28) pupils in respect to grades kindergarten through 8, inclusive; and twenty-five (25) pupils in respect to grades 9 through 12, inclusive.

As used in this section the phrase “individual class session” shall not include any class session held in grades kindergarten through 8, inclusive, in courses in visual and performing arts, industrial arts, and physical education. The phrase shall not include any class session held in grades 9 through 12, inclusive, in courses in commercial arts, visual and performing arts, industrial arts, vocational arts, and physical education. The phrase “individual class session” shall not include any class session held in grades 9 through 12, inclusive, for which two or more individual class groups which come within the descriptions specified by the first paragraph of this section and subdivision (a) or (b), or both, are assembled together in the same room for joint lectures or demonstrations.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c), grades 7, 8, and 9 of a junior high school shall be deemed to be high school grades for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 19.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

41375.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to encourage, by every means possible, the reduction of class sizes and the ratio of pupils to teachers in all grade levels in the public schools, and to urge every effort to this end to be undertaken by the local school administrative authorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41376.

(a) The Superintendent, in computing apportionments and allowances from the State School Fund for the second principal apportionment, shall determine the following for the regular day classes of the elementary schools maintained by each school district:

(1) (A) For grades 1 to 3, inclusive, the Superintendent shall determine the number of classes, the number of pupils enrolled in each class, the total enrollment in all such classes, the average number of pupils enrolled per class, and the total of the numbers of pupils which are in excess of thirty (30) in each class.

(B) For those school districts
 that do not have any classes with an enrollment in excess of 32 and whose average size for all the classes is 30.0 or less, there shall be no excess declared. For those school districts that have one or more classes in excess of an enrollment of 32 or whose average size for all the classes is more than 30, the excess shall be the total of the number of pupils which are in excess of 30 in each class having an enrollment of more than 30.

(2) For grades 4 to 8, inclusive, the Superintendent shall determine the total number of pupils enrolled, the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers, and the average number of pupils per each full-time equivalent classroom teacher. The Superintendent shall also determine the excess if any, of pupils enrolled in such grades in the following manner:

(A) Determine the number of pupils by which the average number of pupils per each full-time
 equivalent classroom teacher for the current fiscal year exceeds the greater of the average number of pupils per each full-time equivalent classroom teacher in all the appropriate districts of the state, as determined by the Superintendent for October 30, 1964, or the average number of pupils per each full-time equivalent classroom teacher which existed in the school district on either October 30, 1964, or March 30, 1964, as selected by the governing board of the school district.

(B) Multiply the number determined in subparagraph (A) by the number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers of the current fiscal year.

(C) Reduce the number determined in subparagraph (B) by the remainder that results from dividing such number by the average number of pupils per each full-time equivalent teacher for October 30, 1964, as determined by the Superintendent in subparagraph (A).

(3) The Superintendent shall compute the product obtained by multiplying the excess number of pupils, if any, in paragraph (1) by ninety-seven hundredths.

(4) If the school district reports that it has maintained, during the current fiscal year, any classes in which there were enrolled pupils in excess of 30 per class pursuant to paragraph (1), and there is no excess number of pupils computed pursuant to paragraph (2), the Superintendent shall decrease the average daily attendance reported under the provisions of Section 41601 by the product determined pursuant to paragraph (3).

(5) If the school district reports that it has maintained, during the current fiscal year, no classes in which there were enrolled pupils in excess of 30 per class determined pursuant to paragraph (1), and there is an excess number of pupils
 computed pursuant to paragraph (2), the Superintendent shall compute the product obtained by multiplying the excess number of pupils computed pursuant to paragraph (2) by ninety-seven hundredths. The Superintendent shall decrease the average daily attendance reported under the provisions of Section 41601 by the resulting product.

(6) If the school district reports that it has maintained, during the current fiscal year, any classes in which there were enrolled pupils in excess of 30 per class determined pursuant to paragraph (1), and there is an excess number of pupils computed pursuant to paragraph (2), the Superintendent shall add to the product determined pursuant to paragraph (3), the product determined pursuant to paragraph (5), and shall decrease the average daily attendance reported under the provisions of Section 41601 by this total amount.

(b) The governing board of each
 school district maintaining elementary schools shall report for the fiscal year 1964–65 and each year thereafter the information required for the determination to be made by the Superintendent pursuant to this section in accordance with instructions provided on forms furnished and prescribed by the Superintendent. Such information shall be reported by the school district together with, and at the same time as, the reports required to be filed for the second principal apportionment of the State School Fund. The forms on which the data and information is reported shall include a certification by the superintendent of each school district or its chief administrative officer that the data is correct and accurate for the period covered, according to his or her best information and belief.

(c) For purposes of this section, a “full-time equivalent classroom teacher” means an employee of an elementary, high school, or unified school district, employed
 in a position requiring certification qualifications and whose duties require him to teach pupils in the elementary schools of that district in regular day classes for the full time for which he is employed during the regular schoolday. In reporting the total number of full-time equivalent classroom teachers, there shall be included, in addition to those employees defined above, the full-time equivalent of all fractional time for which employees in positions requiring certification qualifications are required to devote to teaching pupils in the elementary schools of the district in regular day classes during the regular schoolday.

(d) For purposes of this section, the number of pupils enrolled in each class means the average of the active enrollment in that class on the last teaching day of each school month that ends before April 15 of each school year.

(e) This section shall not
 be applicable to school districts with less than 101 units of average daily attendance for the current fiscal year.

(f) The Superintendent shall adopt rules and regulations that he or she may deem necessary for the effective administration of this section. Those rules and regulations may specify that no decrease in average daily attendance reported under the provisions of Section 41601 shall be made for a school district on account of large classes due to instructional television or team teaching, which may necessarily involve class sizes at periods during the day larger than the standard set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 40.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

41376.1.

(a) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, until the Superintendent determines that a school district is funded pursuant to Section 42238.02, and notwithstanding the requirement to decrease average daily attendance pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 and subdivision (e) of Section 41378, the Superintendent shall compute a reduction to the school district local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the specified school year by the sum of the following:

(1) (A) Multiply the sum of the products obtained in subdivision (e) of Section 41378 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living
 pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(B) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (A) by the sum of the entitlements computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 for all school districts, divided by the sum of the local control funding formula entitlements computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 for all school districts.

(2) (A) Multiply the product obtained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 6, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year divided by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 8, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school
 year.

(B) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (A) by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(C) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (B) by the sum of the entitlements computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 for all school districts, divided by the sum of the local control funding formula entitlements computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 for all school districts.

(3) (A) Multiply the product obtained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 by the average daily
 attendance for grades 7 and 8 reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year divided by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 8, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year.

(B) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (A) by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(C) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (B) by the sum of the entitlements computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03 and paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 42238.03 for all school districts, divided by the sum of the local control funding formula entitlements
 computed pursuant to Section 42238.02 for all school districts.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, if the Superintendent determines that a school district is funded pursuant to Section 42238.02, and notwithstanding the requirement to decrease average daily attendance pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 and subdivision (e) of Section 41378, the Superintendent shall compute a reduction to the school district local control funding formula entitlement pursuant to Section 42238.02 for the specified school year by the sum of the following:

(1) Multiply the sum of the products obtained in subdivision (e) of Section 41378 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section
 42238.02.

(2) (A) Multiply the product obtained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 41376 by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 6, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year divided by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 8, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year.

(B) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (A) by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(3) (A) Multiply the product obtained pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 41376 by the average daily attendance for grades 7 and 8 reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year divided by the average daily attendance for grades 4 to 8, inclusive, reported by the school district pursuant to Section 41601 for the specified school year.

(B) Multiply the product obtained in subparagraph (A) by the grade span adjusted base grant specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as annually adjusted for cost of living pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 30.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

41378.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in computing apportionments and allowances from the State School Fund for the second principal apportionment, shall determine the following for the kindergarten classes maintained by each school district maintaining kindergarten classes.

(a) The number of pupils enrolled in each kindergarten class, the total enrollment in all such classes, and the average number of pupils enrolled per class. 

(b) The total number of pupils which are in excess of thirty-three (33) in each class having an enrollment of more than thirty-three (33).

(c) The total number of pupils by which the average class size in the district exceeds 31.

(d) The greater number of pupils as determined in (b) or (c) above.

(e) He shall compute the product obtained by multiplying the excess number of pupils computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section by ninety-seven hundredths (0.97). He shall decrease the average daily attendance reported under the provisions of Section 41601 by the resulting product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41381.

The State Board of Education may waive the minimum schoolday requirements of Section 46112 to enable school districts to establish experimental educational programs in reading and mathematics. A waiver shall be granted pursuant to this section only if:

(a) The State Board of Education has approved the experimental program.

(b) The total weekly minutes of instruction in the experimental program are equivalent to the total number of minutes per week which would be required by Section 46112.

Participating school districts shall conduct pretesting and posttesting of pupils enrolled in such experimental educational programs to determine the academic achievement of such pupils. Such tests shall be approved by the State Board of Education. Participating school districts shall also conduct control testing programs of pupils not enrolled in such experimental educational programs. Pupils in the control group shall be selected to be, as nearly as practicable, comparable in ability and socioeconomic background to pupils enrolled in the experimental programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41382.

The principal of any elementary school maintaining kindergarten classes or regular day classes in grades 1 to 3, inclusive, may recommend to the governing board of the school district, or the governing board may adopt a resolution determining, that an exemption should be granted from any of the provisions of Section 41376, 41378, or 41379 with respect to such classes on the basis that such provisions prevent the school and school district from developing more effective educational programs to improve instruction in reading and mathematics for pupils in the specified classes. Upon approval of such recommendation, or the adoption of such resolution, the governing board shall make application to the State Board of Education on behalf of the school for an exemption for such classes from the specified provisions. The State Board of Education shall grant the application if it finds that the specified provisions of Section 41376, 41378, or 41379 prevent the school from developing more effective educational programs to improve instruction in reading and mathematics for pupils in the specified classes and shall, upon granting the application, exempt the school district from the penalty provision of such sections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Teaching and Nonteaching Certificated Employee Ratios [41400. - 41409.3.]

41400.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature to improve public education in California by maximizing the allocation of existing resources, to discourage the growth of bureaucracy in the public schools, and to emphasize the importance and significance of the classroom teacher.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41401.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:
